North Dakota statutes. CONSTITUTION OF NORTH DAKOTA
ARTICLE V ELECTIVE FRANCHISE

Section 121.

Repealed by art. amd. 104, approved November 7, 1978 (S.L. 1977, ch. 611, § 2; 1979 ch. 695). The section as amended by art. amd. 69, approved June 24, 1958 (S.L. 1957, ch. 402; 1959, ch. 431) read:

Every person of the age of twenty-one or upwards who is a citizen of the United States and who shall have resided in the state one year and in the county ninety days and in the precinct thirty days next preceding any election shall be a qualified elector
at such election. Provided that where a qualified elector moves from one precinct to another within the state he shall be entitled to vote in the precinct from which he moves until he establishes his residence in the precinct to which
he moves.

The section was purportedly amended by art. amd. 40, approved June 28, 1922 (S.L. 1921, ch. 41, p. 79). The purported amendment, repealed by art. amd. 69, approved June 24, 1958 (S.L. 1957, ch. 402; 1959, ch. 431) and by art. amd. 104, approved November
7, 1978 (S.L. 1977, ch. 611, § 2; 1979, ch. 695), read:

North Dakota: Every qualified elector, who shall have resided in the state one year, in the county ninety days and in the precinct thirty days next preceding any election, shall be entitled to vote at such election. Provided that where a qualified elector
moves from one precinct to another within the state, he shall be entitled to vote in the precinct from which he moves until he establishes his residence in the precinct to which he moves.

The section as amended by art. amd. 37, approved November 2, 1920 (S.L. 1917, ch. 89; 1919, ch. 92) read:

Every person of the age of twenty-one years or upwards, belonging to either of the following classes who shall have resided in the state one year and in the county ninety days and in the precinct thirty days next preceding any election shall be a qualified
elector at such election. First, citizens of the United States; second, civilized persons of Indian descent who have severed their tribal relations two years next preceding such election.

The section as amended by art. amd. 2, approved November 8, 1898 (S.L. 1895, p. 177; 1897, p. 349) read:

Every male person of the age of twenty-one years or upwards, belonging to either of the following classes who shall have resided in the state one year and in the county six months and in the precinct ninety days next preceding any election shall be (deemed)
a qualified elector at such election.

First. Citizens of the United States.

Second. Civilized persons of Indian descent, who shall have severed their tribal relations two years next preceding such election.

The section as originally adopted read:

Every male person of the age of twenty-one years or upwards belonging to either of the following classes, who shall have resided in the State one year, in the county six months and in the precinct ninety days next preceding any election, shall be deemed
a qualified elector at such election:

First. Citizens of the United States.

Second. Persons of foreign birth who shall have declared their intention to become citizens, one year and not more than six years prior to such election, conformably to the naturalization laws of the United States.

Third. Civilized persons of Indian descent who shall have severed their tribal relations two years next preceding such election.

Section 122.

Repealed by art. amd. 104, approved November 7, 1978 (S.L. 1977, ch. 611, § 2; 1979, ch. 695). The section as originally adopted read:

The Legislative Assembly shall be empowered to make further extensions of suffrage hereafter, at its discretion, to all citizens of mature age and sound mind, not convicted of crime, without regard to sex; but no law extending or restricting the right
of suffrage shall be in force until adopted by a majority of the electors of the state voting at a general election.

Section 123.

Repealed by art. amd. 104, approved November 7, 1978 (S.L. 1977, ch. 611, § 2; 1979, ch. 695). The section as originally adopted read:

Electors shall in all cases except treason, felony, breach of the peace or illegal voting, be privileged from arrest on the days of election during their attendance at, going to and returning from such election, and no elector shall be obliged to perform
military duty on the day of election, except in time of war or public danger.

Section 124.

Repealed by art. amd. 104, approved November 7, 1978 (S.L. 1977, ch. 611, § 2; 1979, ch. 695). The section as originally adopted read:

The general elections of the state shall be biennial, and shall be held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November; provided, that the first general election under this Constitution shall be held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday
in November, A.D. 1890.

Section 125.

Repealed by art. amd. 104, approved November 7, 1978 (S.L. 1977, ch. 611, § 2; 1979, ch. 695). The section as originally adopted read:

No elector shall be deemed to have lost his residence in this state by reason of his absence on business of the United States or of this state, or in the military or naval service of the United States.

Section 126.

Repealed by art. amd. 104, approved November 7, 1978 (S.L. 1977, ch. 611, § 2; 1979, ch. 695). The section as originally adopted read:

No soldier, seaman or marine in the army or navy of the United States shall be deemed a resident of this state in consequence of his being stationed therein.

Section 127.

Repealed by art. amd. 104, approved November 7, 1978 (S.L. 1977, ch. 611, § 2; 1979, ch. 695). The section as amended by art. amd. 2, approved November 8, 1898 (S.L. 1895, p. 177; 1897, p. 349) read:

No person who is under guardianship, non compos mentis, or insane, shall be qualified to vote at any election, nor shall any person convicted of treason or felony, unless restored to civil (social) rights, and the legislature shall by law establish an
educational test as a qualification, and may prescribe penalties for failing, neglecting or refusing to vote at any general election.

The section as originally adopted read:

No person who is under guardianship, non compos mentis, or insane, shall be qualified to vote at any election, nor shall any person convicted of treason or felony, unless restored to civil rights.

Section 128.

Repealed by art. amd. 104, approved November 7, 1978 (S.L. 1977, ch. 611, § 2; 1979, ch. 695). The section as originally adopted read:

Any woman having the qualifications enumerated in section 121 of this article as to age, residence and citizenship, and including those now qualified by the laws of the territory, may vote for all school officers, and upon all questions pertaining solely
to school matters, and be eligible to any school office.

Section 129.

Repealed by art. amd. 104, approved November 7, 1978 (S.L. 1977, ch. 611, § 2; 1979, ch. 695). The section as originally adopted read:

All elections by the people shall be by secret ballot, subject to such regulations as shall be provided by law.